en: Tin whistle body material: Aluminum; Brass; Copper; Mixed materials; Nickel silver; Polymer/Plastic; Stainless steel; Tinplate; Wood; Other
sl-SI: Material trupa irske piščali: Aluminij; Medenina; Baker; Mešani materiali; Novo srebro (alpaka); Polimer/plastika; Nerjavno jeklo; Bela pločevina; Les; Drugo
it: Materiale del corpo del tin whistle: Alluminio; Ottone; Rame; Materiali misti; Alpacca; Polimero/Plastica; Acciaio inossidabile; Latta; Legno; Altro
nl: Tin whistle bodymateriaal: Aluminium; Messing; Koper; Gemengde materialen; Nieuwzilver; Polymeer/plastic; Roestvrij staal; Blik; Hout; Overige
pl: Materiał korpusu flażoletu: Aluminium; Mosiądz; Miedź; Z różnych materiałów; Alpaka; Polimer/plastik; Stal nierdzewna; Blacha ocynowana; Drewno; Inne
el: Υλικό κατασκευής του σώματος της φλογέρας: Αλουμίνιο; Ορείχαλκος; Χαλκός; Μικτά υλικά; Αλπακάς (νικέλιο-ασήμι); Πολυμερές/Πλαστικό; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Λευκοσίδηρος; Ξύλο; Άλλο
lt-LT: Airiškos fleitos korpuso medžiaga: Aliuminis; Žalvaris; Varis; Mišrios medžiagos; Nikelio sidabras; Polimeras / plastikas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Skarda; Mediena; Kita
bg-BG: Материал на корпуса на тенекиената свирка: Алуминий; Месинг; Мед; Смесени материали; Алпака; Полимер/пластмаса; Неръждаема стомана; Калайдисана ламарина; Дърво; Друго
fi: Huilun rungon materiaali: Alumiini; Messinki; Kupari; Yhdistelmämateriaalit; Uushopea; Polymeeri/muovi; Ruostumaton teräs; Läkkipelti; Puu; Muu
es: Material del cuerpo de la flauta irlandesa: Aluminio; Latón; Cobre; Materiales mixtos; Alpaca; Polímero/plástico; Acero inoxidable; Hojalata; Madera; Otro
zh-CN: 锡哨管身材质: 铝; 黄铜; 铜; 混合材料; 镍银; 聚合物/塑料; 不锈钢; 马口铁; 木材; 其他
th: หมายเลขประจำตัวผู้เสียภาษีวัสดุตัวนกหวีด: อะลูมิเนียม; ทองเหลือง; ทองแดง; วัสดุผสม; นิกเกิลซิลเวอร์; พอลิเมอร์/พลาสติก; สเตนเลสสตีล; แผ่นเหล็กชุบดีบุก; ไม้; อื่นๆ
ja: ティンホイッスル本体素材: アルミニウム; 真鍮; 銅; 混合素材; ニッケルシルバー; ポリマー/プラスチック; ステンレススチール; ブリキ; 木材; その他
cs: Materiál těla irské flétny: Hliník; Mosaz; Měď; Smíšené materiály; Alpaka; Polymer/plast; Nerezová ocel; Pocínovaný plech; Dřevo; Ostatní
tr: Teneke düdükler gövde malzemesi: Alüminyum; Pirinç; Bakır; Karışık materyaller; Nikel gümüş; Polimer/Plastik; Paslanmaz çelik; Teneke; Ahşap; Diğer
pt-BR: Apito irlandês material do corpo: Alumínio; Latão; Cobre; Materiais mistos; Prata de níquel; Polímero/plástico; Aço inoxidável; Folha de flandres; Madeira; Outros
sv: Material för visselpipans kropp: Aluminium; Mässing; Koppar; Blandade material; Nysilver; Polymer/plast; Rostfritt stål; Bleckplåt; Trä; Annat
fr: Matériau du corps de la flûte irlandaise: Aluminium; Laiton; Cuivre; Matériaux mixtes; Maillechort; Polymère/Plastique; Acier inoxydable; Fer-blanc; Bois; Autre
ko: 틴 휘슬 본체 소재: 알루미늄; 황동; 구리; 혼합 소재; 니켈 실버; 폴리머/플라스틱; 스테인리스 스틸; 양철; 목재; 기타
hu: Fémsíp testének anyaga: Alumínium; Sárgaréz; Réz; Vegyes anyagok; Alpakka; Polimer/műanyag; Rozsdamentes acél; Ónlemez; Fa; Egyéb
sk-SK: Plechový materiál tela píšťaly: Hliník; Mosadz; Meď; Zmiešané materiály; Alpaka; Polymér/Plast; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Pocínovaný plech; Drevo; Iné
zh-TW: 錫哨笛管身材質: 鋁; 黃銅; 紅銅; 混合材質; 鎳銀; 聚合物/塑膠; 不鏽鋼; 馬口鐵; 木材; 其他
vi: Vật liệu thân sáo thiếc: Nhôm; Đồng thau; Đồng đỏ; Vật liệu pha trộn; Bạc niken; Polymer/Nhựa; Thép không gỉ; Sắt tây; Gỗ; Khác
ru: Материал корпуса ирландской флейты: Алюминий; Латунь; Медь; Смешанные материалы; Нейзильбер; Полимер/пластик; Нержавеющая сталь; Жесть; Дерево; Другое
hr-HR: Materijal vrha tijela zviždaljke: Aluminij; Mjed; Bakar; Miješani materijali; Novo srebro; Polimer/plastika; Nehrđajući čelik; Bijeli lim; Drvo; Ostalo
nb: Kroppsmateriale for blikkfløyte: Aluminium; Messing; Kobber; Blandede materialer; Nysølv; Polymer/plast; Rustfritt stål; Blikk; Tre; Annet
da: Kropsmateriale for tin whistle: Aluminium; Messing; Kobber; Blandede materialer; Nysølv; Polymer/plastik; Rustfrit stål; Blik; Træ; Andet
pt-PT: Material do corpo da flauta irlandesa: Alumínio; Latão; Cobre; Materiais mistos; Alpaca; Polímero/plástico; Aço inoxidável; Folha de flandres; Madeira; Outro
de: Material des Tin-Whistle-Korpus: Aluminium; Messing; Kupfer; Gemischte Materialien; Neusilber; Polymer/Kunststoff; Edelstahl; Weißblech; Holz; Sonstige
ro-RO: Material al corpului fluierului irlandez: Aluminiu; Alamă; Cupru; Materiale mixte; Alpaca (nichel-argint); Polimer/Plastic; Oțel inoxidabil; Tablă cositorită; Lemn; Altele